Utah statutes.
78B-5-610.   When unnecessary.
If the evidence shows that the party against whom the writing is offered has
at any time admitted its execution, no other evidence of the execution need be
given if the instrument is one produced from the custody of the adverse party
and has been acted upon by the party as genuine.
